Vermont, session 2025-2026, H472.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * OPR Fees and Fund Management * * *
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 118 is amended to read:
§ 118. COLLECTION AND DISPOSITION OF REVENUE
(a) There is hereby created a Secretary of State Services Fund. The Fund
shall be used to provide appropriations for the operations of the Office of the
Secretary of State, with the exception of those operations provided for in
chapter 5, subchapter 3 of this title. The Fund shall be administered as a
special fund pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5. At the end of each
fiscal year, the unobligated balance in this Fund shall be transferred to the
General Fund.
(b) All revenues collected by the Secretary of State shall be deposited into
the Secretary of State Services Fund except for the following revenues:
(1) any revenues collected by the Office of Professional Regulation set
forth in chapter 5, subchapter 3 of this title; and
(2) any revenues collected pursuant to subsection 117(k) of this title.
(c) The Secretary of State shall have the authority to collect and deposit
into the Secretary of State Services Fund revenues generated from optional
services offered in the normal course of business, including for one-time or
periodic sales of data by subscription or other contractual basis.
VT LEG #384272 v.1

No. 58 Page 2 of 12
2025
Sec. 1a. SECRETARY OF STATE; REPORT; REVENUES FROM SALES
OF DATA
On or before December 1, 2025, the Secretary of State shall submit to the
House Committees on Energy and Digital Infrastructure, on Government
Operations and Military Affairs, and on Ways and Means and to the Senate
Committees on Finance, on Government Operations, and on Institutions a
written report detailing the revenues generated from optional services through
sales of data, as authorized pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 118(c), including the
categories of data sold.
Sec. 2. 3 V.S.A. § 125 is amended to read:
§ 125. FEES
(a) In addition to the fees otherwise authorized by law, a board or advisor
profession may charge the following fees:
(1) Verification of license, $20.00 $30.00.
* * *
(b) Unless otherwise provided by law, the following fees shall apply to all
professions regulated by the Director in consultation with advisor appointees
under Title 26:
* * *
(4) Biennial renewal, $275.00, except biennial renewal for:
* * *
(W) Electrology shop, $200.00.
VT LEG #384272 v.1

No. 58 Page 3 of 12
2025
* * *
(9) Apprenticeship application, $50.00.
(10) Specialty or endorsement to existing license application, $100.00.
(11) Disciplinary action surcharge, $250.00.
(c) Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, a board shall not
require payment of renewal fees for years during which a license was lapsed.
[Repealed.]
* * *
* * * 2027 Fee Increase; Peer Support Providers * * *
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. § 125 is amended to read:
§ 125. FEES
* * *
(b) Unless otherwise provided by law, the following fees shall apply to all
professions regulated by the Director in consultation with advisor appointees
under Title 26:
* * *
(4) Biennial renewal, $275.00, except biennial renewal for:
* * *
(V) Peer support providers or peer recovery support specialists,
$50.00 $75.00.
* * *
VT LEG #384272 v.1

No. 58 Page 4 of 12
2025
* * * OPR Duties and Disciplinary Authority * * *
Sec. 4. 3 V.S.A. § 123 is amended to read:
§ 123. DUTIES OF OFFICE
* * *
(k) For any profession attached to it, the Office shall provide a pre-
application determination of an individual’s criminal background. This
determination shall not be binding on the Office in a future application if the
individual violates probation or parole or is convicted of another crime
following the determination.
* * *
(2) The individual shall submit this request online, accompanied by the
fee for preapplication determinations set forth in section 125 of this
subchapter. If the individual thereafter applies for licensure, this
preapplication fee shall be deducted from that license application fee.
* * *
(m) The provisions of subsection 116a(b) of this title shall not apply to the
Office. The Office shall utilize the procedures within 26 V.S.A. chapter 57 to
review whether regulation of a profession is still necessary.
Sec. 5. 3 V.S.A. § 127 is amended to read:
§ 127. UNAUTHORIZED PRACTICE
* * *
VT LEG #384272 v.1

No. 58 Page 5 of 12
2025
(b)(1) A person practicing a regulated profession without authority or an
employer permitting such practice may, upon the complaint of the Attorney
General or a State’s Attorney or an attorney assigned by the Office of
Professional Regulation, be enjoined therefrom by the Superior Court where
the violation occurred or the Washington County Superior Court and may be
assessed a civil penalty of not more than $5,000.00.
(2)(A) The Attorney General or an attorney assigned by the Office of
Professional Regulation may elect to bring an action seeking only a civil
penalty of not more than $2,500.00 $5,000.00 for practicing or permitting the
practice of a regulated profession without authority before the board having
regulatory authority over the profession or before an administrative law officer.
* * *
Sec. 6. 3 V.S.A. § 129 is amended to read:
§ 129. POWERS OF BOARDS OR OF DIRECTOR IN ADVISOR
PROFESSIONS; DISCIPLINE PROCESS
(a) In addition to any other provisions of law, a board or the Director, in the
case of professions that have advisor appointees, may exercise the following
powers:
* * *
(3) Issue warnings or reprimands, suspend, revoke, limit, condition,
deny, or prevent renewal of licenses, after disciplinary hearings or, in cases
requiring emergency action, immediately suspend, as provided by section 814
VT LEG #384272 v.1

No. 58 Page 6 of 12
2025
of this title. In a case involving noncompliance with a statute or rule relating
to administrative duties not related to patient, client, or customer care, a board
or hearing officer may determine that ordering a monetary civil penalty does
not constitute a finding of unprofessional conduct. After a finding of
unprofessional conduct, a respondent shall pay a disciplinary action surcharge
pursuant to subdivision 125(b)(11) of this title. The proceeds from the
disciplinary action surcharge shall be deposited into the Professional
Regulatory Fee Fund.
* * *
* * * Cosmetology Certificate of Approval * * *
Sec. 7. 26 V.S.A. § 281 is amended to read:
§ 281. POSTSECONDARY SCHOOL OF BARBERING AND
COSMETOLOGY; CERTIFICATE OF APPROVAL
(a) A school of barbering or cosmetology shall not be granted a certificate
of approval unless the school:
* * *
(4) Requires a school term of training consistent with formal training
requirements established by rule, which shall include practical demonstrations
and theoretical studies in sanitation, sterilization, the use of antiseptics, and the
use of appliances, devices, treatments, and preparations relevant to the field of
licensure, and training on the care, styling, and treatment of textured hair. For
purposes of this subdivision, “textured hair” means hair that is coiled, curly, or
VT LEG #384272 v.1

No. 58 Page 7 of 12
2025
wavy. The training on the care, styling, and treatment of textured hair shall
include:
(A) techniques for cutting, styling, and chemical treatments for
textured hair;
(B) knowledge of products and tools specifically designed for
textured hair;
(C) best practices for hair health and scalp care for clients with
textured hair; and
(D) cultural competency and historical education on the significance
of textured hair in diverse communities.
* * *
* * * Nursing Assistants; License Renewal * * *
Sec. 8. 26 V.S.A. § 1645 is amended to read:
§ 1645. RENEWAL
(a) To renew a license, a nursing assistant shall meet ongoing practice
requirements set by the Board by rule.
(b) The Board shall credit as ongoing practice those activities, regardless of
title or obligation to hold a license, that reasonably tend to reinforce the
training and skills of a licensee.
(c)(1) A licensee seeking to renew an expired or lapsed license after fewer
than five years of absence from practice shall repeat and pass the competency
VT LEG #384272 v.1

No. 58 Page 8 of 12
2025
examinations approved by the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and
Independent Living before licensure renewal.
(2) A licensee who does not pass the competency examinations shall
repeat a nursing assistant education program and competency examination.
* * * Repeals; Funeral Service Escrow Agents; Motor Vehicle Racing * * *
Sec. 9. 3 V.S.A. § 122 is amended to read:
§ 122. OFFICE OF PROFESSIONAL REGULATION
The Office of Professional Regulation is created within the Office of the
Secretary of State. The Office shall have a director who shall be qualified by
education and professional experience to perform the duties of the position.
The Director of the Office of Professional Regulation shall be a classified
position with the Office of the Secretary of State. The following boards or
professions are attached to the Office of Professional Regulation:
* * *
(21) Motor Vehicle Racing [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 10. 26 V.S.A. § 1272 is amended to read:
§ 1272. RULES; PREPAID FUNERAL FUNDS
The Director shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this subchapter
to ensure the proper handling of all funds paid pursuant to a prepaid funeral
agreement and to protect consumers in the event of default. The rules shall
include provisions relating to the following:
VT LEG #384272 v.1

No. 58 Page 9 of 12
2025
* * *
(2) The appointment of an escrow agent who may be a bank or other
category of individual such as an attorney, a local elected official, next of kin,
or the executor of a buyer’s estate. All prepaid arrangement funds shall be paid
directly to the escrow agent and not to the funeral director or establishment.
[Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 11. REPEALS
(a) 26 V.S.A. § 1275 (prepaid funeral expenses; duties of escrow agents) is
repealed.
(b) 26 V.S.A. chapter 93 (motor vehicle racing) is repealed.
* * * Position; Executive Officer for the Regulation of Mental Health
Professions * * *
Sec. 12. OFFICE OF PROFESSIONAL REGULATION; POSITION;
APPROPRIATION
(a) The position of one new, permanent, full-time, classified Executive
Officer for the Regulation of Mental Health Professions is created in the Office
of Professional Regulation.
(b) The sum of $170,000.00 is appropriated to the Office of Professional
Regulation from the General Fund in fiscal year 2026 for the creation of the
position of Executive Officer for the Regulation of Mental Health Professions
in the Office of Professional Regulation.
VT LEG #384272 v.1

No. 58 Page 10 of 12
2025
* * * Report; Massage Therapy Establishments * * *
Sec. 13. OFFICE OF PROFESSIONAL REGULATION; REPORT;
MASSAGE THERAPY ESTABLISHMENTS
On or before November 15, 2025, the Office of Professional Regulation, in
consultation with interested stakeholders, including representatives from the
Vermont Chapter of the American Association of Massage Therapists, the
Vermont Network Against Domestic and Sexual Violence, the Department of
State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs, and other Vermont law enforcement agencies,
shall submit to the House Committee on Government Operations and Military
Affairs and the Senate Committee on Government Operations proposed
legislation for the regulation, which may include licensure, of massage therapy
establishments, as defined in 26 V.S.A. § 5401(2)(A).
* * * Accessibility and Confidentiality of Disciplinary Matters * * *
Sec. 14. 3 V.S.A. § 131 is amended to read:
§ 131. ACCESSIBILITY AND CONFIDENTIALITY OF DISCIPLINARY
MATTERS
* * *
(c) The Secretary of State, through the Office of Professional Regulation,
shall prepare and maintain a register of all complaints, which shall be a public
record and which shall show:
VT LEG #384272 v.1

No. 58 Page 11 of 12
2025
(1) with respect to all complaints, the following information:
(A) the date and the nature of the complaint, but not including the
identity of the licensee or the complainant; and
(B) a summary of the completed investigation; and
(2) only with respect to complaints resulting in filing of disciplinary
charges or stipulations or the taking of disciplinary action, the following
additional information:
(A) the name and business addresses public address of the licensee
and complainant;
(B) formal charges, provided that they have been served or a
reasonable effort to serve them has been made, and all subsequent pleadings
filed by the parties;
(C) the findings, conclusions, rulings, and orders of the board or
administrative law officer;
(D) the transcript of the hearing, if one has been made, and exhibits
admitted at the hearing;
(E) stipulations filed with the board or administrative law officer; and
(F) final disposition of the matter by the appellate officer or the
courts.
* * *
VT LEG #384272 v.1

No. 58 Page 12 of 12
2025
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 15. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025, except that Sec. 3 (fees; peer
support providers) shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
Date Governor signed bill: June 11, 2025
VT LEG #384272 v.1